fst/adjectives.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
+Adj 
+Sg 
+Pl 
+Masc 
+Fem
+Obl
+Dir
^GuessAdjectiveI
^GuessAdjectiveII

LEXICON Root
^GuessAdjectiveI AdjectiveI;
^GuessAdjectiveII AdjectiveII;

LEXICON AdjectiveI
+Adj:0                  #;

LEXICON AdjectiveII
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Dir:0  #;
+Adj+Masc+Pl+Dir:^े  #;
+Adj+Masc+Sg+Obl:^े  #;
+Adj+Masc+Pl+Obl:^े  #;
+Adj+Fem+Sg+Dir:^ी   #;
+Adj+Fem+Pl+Dir:^ी   #;
+Adj+Fem+Sg+Obl:^ी   #;
+Adj+Fem+Pl+Obl:^ी   #;
